Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 6 Child Sexual Abuse
37-1-607. Child protective teams — Investigations — Services.

The department shall coordinate the services of child protective teams. At least one (1) child protective team shall be organized in each county. The district attorney general of each judicial district shall, by January 15 of each year, report to the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families on the status of the teams in the district attorney general's district as required by this section, and the progress of the child protective teams that have been organized in the district attorney general's district. The department shall, with the cooperation of all statutorily authorized members of the child protective team, establish a procedure and format for data collection. The procedure and format developed shall include at a minimum the following information:

The number of reports received for investigation by type (i.e., sexual abuse, serious physical abuse, life-threatening neglect);

The number of investigations initiated by type;

The number of final dispositions of cases obtained in the current reporting year by type of disposition as follows:

Unsubstantiated, closed, no service;

Unsubstantiated, referred for non-custodial support services;

Substantiated, closed, no service;

Substantiated, service provided, no prosecution;

Substantiated, service provided, prosecution, acquittal; or

Substantiated, service provided, prosecution, conviction;

Age, race, gender, and relationship to the victim of perpetrators identified in cases that are included in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(iii)(c )-(f ); and

The type and amount of community-based support received by child protective teams through linkages with other local agencies and organizations and through monetary or in-kind, or both, donations.

Such data shall be reported by January 15 of each year to the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families, along with a progress report on the teams and any recommendations for enhancement of the child sexual abuse plan and program.

Each team shall be composed of one (1) person from the department, one (1) representative from the office of the district attorney general, one (1) juvenile court officer or investigator from a court of competent jurisdiction, and one (1) properly trained law enforcement officer with countywide jurisdiction from the county where the child resides or where the alleged offense occurred. The team may also include a representative from one (1) of the mental health disciplines. It is in the best interest of the child that, whenever possible, an initial investigation shall not be commenced unless all four (4) disciplines are represented. An initial investigation may, however, be commenced if at least two (2) of the team members are present at the initial investigation. In those geographical areas in which a child advocacy center meets the requirements of § 9-4-213(a) or (b), child advocacy center directors, or their designees, shall be members of the teams under this part and part 4 of this chapter for the purposes of provision of services and functions established by § 9-4-213 or delegated pursuant to that section. In such event, child advocacy center directors, or their designees, may access and generate all necessary information, which shall retain its confidential status, consistent with § 37-1-612.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the child protective investigations be conducted by the team members in a manner that not only protects the child but that also preserves any evidence for future criminal prosecutions. It is essential, therefore, that all phases of the child protective investigation be appropriately conducted and that further investigations, as appropriate, be properly conducted and coordinated.

The department shall convene the appropriate team when a report of child sexual abuse has been received. Nothing in this section shall be construed to remove or reduce the duty and responsibility of any person to report all suspected or actual cases of child sexual abuse. The role of the teams shall be to conduct child protective investigations of reported child sexual abuse and to support and provide services to sexually abused children upon referral as deemed by the teams to be necessary and appropriate for such children.

For each child sexual abuse report it receives, the department shall immediately notify the child protection investigation team, which shall commence an on-site child protective investigation. The team shall:

Determine the composition of the family or household, including the name, address, age, sex and race of each child named in the report; any siblings or other children in the same household or in the care of the same adults; the parents or other persons responsible for the child's welfare; and any other adults in the same household;

Determine whether there is any indication that any child in the family or household is sexually abused, including a determination of harm or threatened harm to each child; the nature and extent of present or prior injuries, or abuse, and any evidence thereof; and a determination as to the person or persons apparently responsible for the abuse;

Determine the immediate and long-term risk to each child if the child remains in the existing home environment; and

Determine the protective, treatment and ameliorative services necessary to safeguard and ensure the child's well-being and development and, if possible, to preserve and stabilize family life.

The team shall seek to interview the child in a neutral setting, other than where the alleged abuse occurred, whenever possible.

Immediately upon receipt of a report alleging, or immediately upon learning during the course of an investigation, that:

Child sexual abuse has occurred; or

An observable injury or medically diagnosed internal injury occurred as a result of the sexual abuse;

the department shall orally notify the team, the appropriate district attorney general and the appropriate law enforcement agency whose criminal investigations shall be coordinated, whenever possible, with the child protective team investigation. In all cases, the team and the department shall make a full written report to the district attorney general within three (3) days of the oral report. If, as a result of an investigation, there is cause to believe a violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 10 has occurred, an appropriate report shall be filed by the district attorney general requesting an investigation by the Tennessee bureau of investigation. If independent criminal investigations are made, interviews with the victimized child shall be kept to an absolute minimum and, whenever possible, reference to the videotape or tapes made by the child protective teams should be utilized.

In addition to the requirements of this part, the provisions of § 37-1-406 shall apply to any investigation conducted hereunder.

As a result of its investigation, the team may recommend that criminal charges be filed against the alleged offender. Any interested person who has information regarding the offenses described in this subsection (b) may forward a statement to the district attorney general as to whether prosecution is warranted and appropriate. Within fifteen (15) days of the completion of the district attorney general's investigation, the district attorney general shall advise the department and the team whether or not prosecution is justified and appropriate in the district attorney general's opinion in view of the circumstances of the specific case.

The specialized diagnostic assessment, evaluation, coordination, consultation, and other supportive services that the team shall be capable of providing, to the extent funds are specifically appropriated therefor, or by referral shall be capable of obtaining for the protection of the child, include, but are not limited to, the following:

Telephone consultation services in emergencies and in other situations;

Medical evaluation related to the sexual abuse;

Such psychological and psychiatric diagnosis and evaluation services for the child, siblings, parent or parents, guardian or guardians, or other care givers, or any other individual involved in a child sexual abuse case, as a child protection team may determine to be needed;

Short-term psychological treatment. It is the intent of the general assembly that the department provide or refer a child whose case has been validated by the department, and the child's family, for short-term psychological treatment before the department may close its case. Such short-term treatment shall be limited to no more than six (6) months' duration after treatment is initiated, except that the commissioner may authorize such treatment for individual children beyond this limitation if the commissioner deems it appropriate;

Expert medical, psychological and related professional testimony in court cases;

Case staffings to develop, implement and monitor treatment plans for a child whose case has been validated by the department. In all such case staffings, consultations, or staff activities involving a child, at least one (1) member of the team involved in the initial investigation shall continue to monitor the progress and status of the child whenever possible and within the same geographic area; and

Case service coordination and assistance, including the location of services available from other public and private agencies in the community.

In all instances where a child protection team is providing or has obtained by referral certain services to sexually abused children, other offices and units of the department shall avoid duplicating the provision of those services.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 8; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 3, 5; T.C.A., §37-1-606(a)(2), (4); Acts 1988, ch. 953, §§ 9, 18-20; 1996, ch. 675, § 17; 1999, ch. 453, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 401, § 1; 2011, ch. 410 , § 3(f); 2012, ch. 925, § 5; 2013, ch. 236, § 81; 2019, ch. 345, § 36.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 401, § 4, provided that the amendment to this section, which added subdivision (a)(1)(B), shall apply to any investigation or any civil cause of action pending or filed on or after June 19, 2001.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (a)(1)(A) and (B).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Disclosure to law enforcement agencies of felonious acts of bodily harm or sexual offenses on premises of a facility or hospital whose records are confidential, §33-3-104.

Use of child protective teams in child sexual abuse investigations, §37-1-406.

Attorney General Opinions. DCS authority to reverse child protection team determination of sexual abuse. OAG 10-101, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/1/10).

37-1-608. Protective custody of children.

A law enforcement officer, authorized person of the department, or other authorized person may take a child into custody as provided in part 1 of this chapter.

Any person in charge of a hospital or similar institution or any physician treating a child may keep that child in custody until the next regular weekday session of the juvenile court without the consent of the parents, legal guardian or legal custodian, whether or not additional medical treatment is required, if the circumstances are such, or if the condition of the child is such, that continuing the child in the child's place of residence or in the care or custody of the parents, legal guardian or legal custodian presents an imminent danger to the child's life or physical or mental health. Any person taking a child into protective custody shall immediately notify the department, whereupon the department shall immediately begin a child protective investigation in accordance with the provisions of § 37-1-606, and shall make every reasonable effort to immediately notify the parents, legal guardian or legal custodian that such child has been taken into protective custody. If the department determines, according to the criteria set forth in § 37-1-114, that the child should remain in protective custody longer than the next regular weekday session of the juvenile court, it shall petition the court for an order authorizing such custody in the same manner as if the child were placed in a shelter. The department shall attempt to avoid the placement of a child in an institution whenever possible.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 9.

Cross-References. Retention of abused children by hospitals, §37-1-404.

37-1-609. Photographs and examinations of suspected abuse — Video recordings.

Any person required to investigate cases of suspected child sexual abuse may take or cause to be taken photographs of the areas of trauma visible on a child who is the subject of a report and, if the condition of the child indicates a need for a medical examination, may cause the child to be referred for diagnosis to a licensed physician or an emergency department in a hospital without the consent of the child's parents, legal guardian or legal custodian. Any licensed physician who, based on information furnished by the investigator, the parents or other persons having knowledge of the situation, or the child, or on personal observation of the child, suspects that a child has been sexually abused may authorize appropriate examinations to be performed on the child without the consent of the child's parents, legal guardian or legal custodian.

Any photograph or report on examinations made or x-rays taken pursuant to this section, or copies thereof, shall be sent to the department as soon as possible, at which point such records shall be available to the members of the team. All state, county and local agencies shall give the team or the department access to records in their custody and shall otherwise cooperate fully with the investigation.

At the initial investigation of child sexual abuse by the child protection team, and at any subsequent investigations as deemed appropriate by the team, when a justifiable suspicion of sexual abuse exists, a videotape recording that meets the standards as established by § 24-7-117 may be taken of the traumatized victim. The video recording shall be taken for the purpose of indicating the child's physical or mental condition at the time the report is investigated and shall be made available for future reference and for utilization as provided in this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 10; 1987, ch. 145, § 20; 1988, ch. 953, § 11.

Cross-References. Admissibility into evidence of audio-visually recorded testimony in child sexual abuse proceedings, §24-7-117.

Examination of abused children, §37-1-406.

Physician, health personnel or institutional reports of venereal disease, venereal herpes or chlamydia in children, §37-1-403.

Reference to audio-visual tapes in child sexual abuse proceedings, §§37-1-405,37-1-406.

Use of photographs in child sexual abuse examinations, §37-1-406.

Use of video recordings in child abuse and child sexual abuse proceedings, §37-1-406.

Use of video tapes in termination of parental rights proceedings for severe child abuse, §37-1-405.

Utilization of references to video tapes made by child protective teams in independent criminal investigations, §37-1-607.

37-1-610. Guardian ad litem — Parental reimbursement of costs and expenses.

A guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the child in any child sexual abuse civil or juvenile judicial proceeding and in general sessions or criminal court at the discretion of the court. Any person participating in such proceeding resulting from such appointment shall be presumed prima facie to be acting in good faith and in so doing shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that otherwise might be incurred or imposed.

In those cases in which the parents are financially able, the court may order such parent or parents to reimburse the court to the extent of insurance coverage; provided, that the court shall order the perpetrator in all cases, whether such person is a parent or other person, to fully reimburse the court for such expenses, for the cost of provision of guardian ad litem services and any medical and treatment costs resulting from the child sexual abuse. Reimbursement to the individual providing such services shall not be contingent upon successful collection by the court from the parent or parents.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 11.

Attorney General Opinions. Because a juvenile court has the authority to appoint counsel and to punish disobedience of its orders as contempt, an attorney who refuses a juvenile court order of appointment commits, and may be punished for, contempt, regardless whether she intends to practice in that court in the future, OAG 02-107(10/01/02).

37-1-611. Duties of department of children's services — Cooperation with department — Publicity and education program.

The department shall:

Have prime responsibility for strengthening and improving child sexual abuse detection, prevention and treatment efforts;

Seek and encourage the development of improved or additional programs and activities, the assumption of prevention and treatment responsibilities by additional agencies and organizations, and the coordination of existing programs and activities;

To the fullest extent possible, cooperate with and seek cooperation of all appropriate public and private agencies, including health, education, social services, and law enforcement agencies, and courts, organizations, or programs providing or concerned with children's services related to the prevention, detection, intervention or treatment of child sexual abuse; and

Provide ongoing protective, treatment and ameliorative services to, and on behalf of, children in need of protection to safeguard and ensure their well-being and, whenever possible, to preserve and stabilize family life.

All state, county, and local agencies have a duty to give such cooperation, assistance, and information to the department as will enable it to fulfill its responsibilities.

The department shall conduct a continuing publicity and education program to encourage the fullest degree of reporting of suspected child sexual abuse for staff and officials required to report and any other appropriate persons. The program shall include, but not be limited to, information concerning the responsibilities, obligations, and powers provided under this part; the methods for diagnosis of child sexual abuse; and the procedures of the child protective service program, the juvenile court, and other duly authorized agencies. In developing training programs for staff, the department shall place emphasis on preservice and inservice training for single intake, protective services, and foster care staff, which would include skills in diagnosis and treatment of child sexual abuse and procedures of the child protective system and judicial process.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 12; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501.

37-1-612. Confidentiality of records and reports — Violations — Access to records — Confirmation of investigation — Anonymity of abuse reporters.

In order to protect the rights of the child and the child's parents or other persons responsible for the child's welfare, all records concerning reports of child sexual abuse, including files, reports, records, communications and working papers related to investigations or providing services; video tapes; reports made to the abuse registry and to local offices of the department; and all records generated as a result of such processes and reports, shall be confidential and exempt from other provisions of law, and shall not be disclosed, except as specifically authorized by chapter 5, part 5 of this title, this part and part 4 of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in § 37-5-107, this part or part 4 of this chapter, it is unlawful for any person, except for purposes directly connected with the administration of this part, to disclose, receive, make use of, authorize or knowingly permit, participate in, or acquiesce to the use of any list or name, or any information concerning a report or investigation of a report of harm under this part, directly or indirectly derived from the records, papers, files or communications of the department or other entities authorized by law to assist the department when such information was acquired in the course of the performance of official duties. Disclosure may be made to persons and entities directly involved in administration of this part, including:

Department employees, medical professionals, and contract or other agency employees who provide services, including those from child advocacy centers, to children and families; and

The attorney or guardian ad litem for a child who is the subject of the records. Information shared with such persons and entities does not lose its character as confidential.

In addition to such other purposes as may be directly connected with the administration of this part, access to such records, excluding the name of the reporter, which shall be released only as provided in subsection (g), shall be granted to the following persons, officials, or agencies for the following purposes:

A law enforcement agency investigating a report of known or suspected child sexual abuse;

The district attorney general of the judicial district in which the child resides or in which the alleged abuse occurred;

A grand jury, by subpoena, upon its determination that access to such records is necessary in the conduct of its official business;

Any person engaged in bona fide research or audit purposes. However, no information identifying the subjects of the report shall be made available to the researcher unless such information is absolutely essential to the research purpose, suitable provision is made to maintain the confidentiality of the data and the department has given written approval;

A court official, probation and parole officer, designated employee of the department of correction or board of probation and parole or other similarly situated individual charged with the responsibility of preparing information to be presented in any administrative or judicial proceeding concerning any individual charged with or convicted of any offense involving child abuse or neglect or child sexual abuse;

An attorney or next friend who is authorized to act on behalf of the child, who is the subject of the records, for the purpose of recovering damages or other remedies authorized by law in a civil cause of action against the perpetrator or other person or persons who may be responsible for the actions of the perpetrator;

An attorney or next friend who is authorized to act on behalf of another child, who has been the victim of other abuse by the same perpetrator, for the purpose of recovering damages or other remedies authorized by law in a civil cause of action against the perpetrator or other person or persons who may be responsible for the actions of the perpetrator against such other child; provided, however, that:

The name and identity of such other child shall be revealed only to the attorney or next friend of such other child, to the parties and to their respective counsel in the civil cause of action in which such damages or other remedies are sought, and to the trial judge who presides over the action;

An appropriate protective order must be entered prior to such disclosure; and

Before any attempt is made to introduce into evidence in the civil cause of action either the records or information obtained from the records, written consent must be obtained from:

Each parent or guardian having sole or joint custody of such other child, if the child has not yet attained the age of majority; or

The former child, if such child has now attained the age of majority; and

Members of the Tennessee claims commission, its staff and employees of the division of claims and risk management for the purpose of determining if:

A claim filed with the commission based on facts contained in the record constitutes a compensable criminal offense under the Criminal Injuries Compensation Act, compiled in title 29, chapter 13;

The offense alleged occurred; and

The claimant's injuries were the result of the offense.

The department may release to professional persons such information as is necessary for the diagnosis and treatment of the child or the person perpetrating the sexual abuse.

The department may confirm whether a child sexual abuse investigation has been commenced, but may not divulge, except as permitted under this part, any details about the case, including, but not limited to, the name of the reporter, the alleged victim, or the alleged perpetrator.

The department shall adopt such rules as may be necessary to carry out the following purposes:

The establishment of administrative and due process procedures for the disclosure of the contents of its files and the results of its investigations for the purpose of protecting children from child sexual abuse; and

For other purposes directly connected with the administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, cooperation with schools, child care agencies, residential and institutional child care providers, child protection agencies, individuals providing care or protection for the child, medical and mental health personnel providing care for the child and the child's family and the perpetrator of any form of child abuse or neglect, law enforcement agencies, the judicial and correctional systems, and for cooperation with scientific and governmental research on child abuse and neglect.

The name of any person reporting child sexual abuse shall in no case be released to any person other than employees of the department or other child protection team members responsible for child protective services, the abuse registry, or the appropriate district attorney general upon subpoena of the Tennessee bureau of investigation without the written consent of the person reporting. This shall not prohibit the subpoenaing of a person reporting child sexual abuse when deemed necessary by the district attorney general or the department to protect a child who is the subject of a report; provided, that the fact that such person made the report is not disclosed. Any person who reports a case of child sexual abuse may, at the time the person makes the report, request that the department notify such person that a child protective investigation occurred as a result of the report. The department shall mail such a notice to the reporter within ten (10) days of the completion of the child protective investigation.

For purposes directly connected with the administration of this part and part 4 of this chapter, the department may disclose any relevant information to the court, administrative board or hearing officer, the parties, or their legal representatives in any proceeding that may be brought in any court, or before any administrative board or hearing officer, for the purpose of protecting a child or children from child abuse or neglect or child sexual abuse. In the event of any disagreement between the department and any other parties as to what information should be disclosed, the court, administrative board or hearing officer may enter an order allowing access to any information that it finds necessary for the proper disposition of the case. The court, administrative board or hearing officer may order any information disclosed in such proceeding to be placed and kept under seal and not to be open to public inspection to the extent it finds it necessary to protect the child. This provision shall not be construed to allow any person to gain access to any identifying information about a child who is not the subject of the proceeding.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 13; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 12-14, 16, 17, 24; 1988, ch. 953, § 10; 1998, ch. 1049, § 5; 1999, ch. 522, §§ 1, 2; 2000, ch. 981, §§ 51, 74; 2001, ch. 401, § 3; 2007, ch. 476, § 1; 2008, ch. 1146, § 2; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 401, § 4 provided that the act, which added subdivisions (c)(6) and (7), shall apply to any investigation or any civil cause of action pending or filed on or after June 19, 2001.

Acts 2007, ch. 476, § 2 provided that the act, which added subdivision (c)(8), shall apply to claims for compensation filed on or after January 1, 2006.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “division of claims and risk management” for “division of claims administration” in the introductory language of (c)(8).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 271, § 3. May 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Anonymity and confidentiality of child sexual abuse reporters, §37-1-409.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Medical examiner autopsy reports not subject to confidentiality requirements, §37-1-605.

Penalty for unlawful disclosure of confidential information, §37-1-615.

Attorney General Opinions. DCS authority to reverse child protection team determination of sexual abuse. OAG 10-101, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/1/10).

Confidentiality of records and testimony regarding child sexual abuse investigations. OAG 11-21, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (3/11/11).

Confidentiality of department of children's services complaints. OAG 13-93, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 108 (11/27/13).

37-1-613. Immunity from civil or criminal liability.

Any person making a report of child sexual abuse shall be afforded the same immunity and shall have the same remedies as provided by §37-1-410 for other persons reporting harm to a child. Any other person, official or institution participating in good faith in any act authorized or required by this part shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise result by reason of such action.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 14.

Cross-References. Immunity from liability for reporting child abuse, §37-1-410.

Law Reviews.

Medical Malpractice Cases Not to File (Lewis L. Laska), 20 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 27 (1989).

37-1-614. Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child sexual abuse cases.

The privileged quality of communication between husband and wife and between any professional person and the professional person's patient or client, and any other privileged communication, except that between attorney and client, as such communication relates both to the competency of the witness and to the exclusion of confidential communications, shall not apply to any situation involving known or suspected child sexual abuse and shall not constitute grounds for failure to report as required by this part, failure to cooperate with the department in its activities pursuant to this part, or failure to give evidence in any judicial proceeding relating to child sexual abuse.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 15.

Cross-References. Evidentiary privileges inapplicable in child abuse cases, §37-1-411.

Privileged communication between husband and wife, §24-1-201.

Privileged communications, title 24, ch. 1, part 2.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501; §§ 501.7 — 501.9, 501.11, 501.13, 501.14, 501.19.

Law Reviews.

Murder and Miscarriage: Miscarriage of Justice?, (Donald F. Paine), 30 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. (1994).

Attorney General Opinions. Communications between an employee of a county sheriff's department and a volunteer clergy member appointed by the sheriff to provide spirtual consultation are confidential and privileged, provided the communications are made to the clergy member confidentially in a professional capacity, according to the usual course of the clergy's practice or discipline, as established by the rules or customs of the clergy's religious organization or denomination when the employee is seeking spiritual advice or counseling; however, this privilege does not apply to any communication involving known or suspected child sexual abuse, OAG 01-009 (1/25/01).

37-1-615. Violations — Penalties.

Any person required to report known or suspected child sexual abuse who knowingly fails to do so, or who knowingly prevents another person from doing so, commits an offense.

A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.

A second or subsequent violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class E felony.

Any person required to report known or suspected child sexual abuse who intentionally fails to do so, or who intentionally prevents another person from doing so, commits a Class E felony.

Any person who knowingly and willfully makes public or discloses any confidential information contained in the abuse registry or in the records of any child sexual abuse case, except as provided in this part, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 16; 1989, ch. 591, § 111; 2019, ch. 499, § 4.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (a) which read, “(a) Any person required to report known or suspected child sexual abuse who knowingly and willfully fails to do so, or who knowingly and willfully prevents another person from doing so, commits a Class A misdemeanor.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 499, § 10. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Limitation of actions in prosecutions for sexual offenses committed against children, §40-2-101.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Penalty for false reporting of child sexual abuse, §37-1-413.

Termination of parental rights, §37-1-147.

37-1-616. Rules and regulations.

The department may promulgate necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, in furtherance of this part.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 17.